Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3260.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin AGRICULTURAL LAND TRENDS.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of agriculture to prepare a report on agricultural land trends. For the purposes of this section, "agricultural land" means property classified as class 2a agricultural land or class 2b rural vacant land under Minnesota Statutes, section 273.13, subdivision 23. The report must include the following: new text end new text begin (1) information about agricultural land sales, including the price paid by the buyer for the land, the number of acres sold, the type of buyer, and the type of financing used by the buyer; new text end new text begin (2) information about agricultural land use, including differences among regions; and new text end new text begin (3) legislative recommendations for ensuring that agricultural land is available to farmers. new text end new text begin No data included in this report may reveal personally identifiable information. The commissioner may contract with external experts to develop this report and may coordinate with the Department of Revenue, University of Minnesota Extension, and Minnesota State Colleges and Universities. No later than January 1, 2027, the commissioner must submit the report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees and divisions with jurisdiction over agriculture. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.28, any unencumbered balance does not cancel at the end of fiscal year 2026 and is available in fiscal year 2027. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end